Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2119.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2121(c) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2121. Killing game or wildlife to protect property.* * *(c) Definition.--As used in this subchapter, the [word "person" shall be limited to any person cultivating, as a primary means of gaining a livelihood, any lands for general or specialized crop purposes, truck farming or fruit orchard or nursery being regularly maintained, as either the owner, lessee or a member of the family of the owner or lessee assisting with the cultivation of the land, or a domiciled member of the household of the owner or lessee or an employee of the owner or lessee, regularly and continuously assisting in the cultivation 123456789101112131415161718 of the land or other person as authorized by commission permit.] term "person" means only the following:(1) The owner or lessee of a normal agricultural operation as defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law.(2) A member of the family of the owner or lessee under paragraph (1) who assists with the operation.(3) A domiciled member of the household of the owner or lessee under paragraph (1) who assists with the operation.(4) An employee of the owner or lessee under paragraph (1) who regularly and continuously assists with the operation.(5) Any other person as authorized by commission permit.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2119PN2740 - 2 - 1234567891011121314